Arkansas, session 2025, HB1571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-44-302(3), concerning the definition of
"adult dropout recovery services" under the Arkansas Adult Diploma Program
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Adult dropout recovery services” means any type of
assistance provided to a diploma-seeking student, including without
limitation:
(A) Sourcing, recruitment, and engagement;
(B) Learning plan development;
(C) Active teaching; and
(D) Proactive coaching and mentoring;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-44-302(18), concerning the definition of
"milestones" under the Arkansas Adult Diploma Program Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(18) “Milestones” means the objective measures of progress for
which payment is made to an approved program provider under this subchapter,
including:
(A) Earned units of high school credit credits whereby a
*CRH044*
02/21/2025 4:11:48 PM CRH044

HB1571
unit of high school credit equals one half (1/2) credit;
(B) Attainment of an employability skills certification;
(C) Attainment of a workforce credential that requires
less than fifty (50) hours of training; and
(D) Attainment of a workforce credential that requires
between fifty-one (51) and one hundred (100) hours of training;
(E) Attainment of a workforce credential that requires
over one hundred (100) hours of training; and
(D)(F) Attainment of an accredited high school diploma;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-44-302(22), concerning the definition of
"unit of high school credit" under the Arkansas Adult Diploma Program Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(22) “Unit of high school credit” means one half (1/2) high school
credit awarded based on a student's demonstration that he or she has
successfully met the content expectation for the credit area as defined by
subject area standards, expectations, or guidelines; and

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-44-305 is amended to read as follows:
6-44-305. Payment.
(a) An approved program provider shall not receive funding for a
student under this subchapter if the approved program provider also receives
federal or state funding or private tuition for the student.
(b) An approved program provider shall:
(1) Receive reimbursement for an enrolled, eligible student who
meets the milestones defined in § 6-44-302; and
(2) Invoice only for course and credit requirements needed to
earn a high school diploma from an approved program provider that may include
additional courses that meet workforce credential requirements.
(c) The Department of Education shall pay an approved program provider
the following amounts for each student who completes the following
milestones:
(1) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each:
(A) Completed half (1/2) high school credit;
(B) Completed employability skills certification; and
(C) Earned workforce credential that requires no more than
02/21/2025 4:11:48 PM CRH044

HB1571
fifty (50) hours of training;
(2) Five hundred dollars ($500) for each earned workforce
credential that requires at least fifty (50) hours but no more than one
hundred (100) hours of training;
(3) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for each earned workforce
credential that requires more than one hundred (100) hours of training; and
(4) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for each earned high school
diploma.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-44-306(b), concerning the process for
paying invoices under the Arkansas Adult Diploma Program Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1) The department shall pay an approved program provider in the
order in which invoices are submitted until all available funds are
exhausted.
(2) Once all available funds are exhausted under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section the department shall notify all approved program
providers that funds are exhausted.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-44-307(a)(2), concerning the annual
reporting required under the Arkansas Adult Diploma Program Act related to
earned high school credits is amended to read as follows:
(2) Total number of half high school credits earned by students
for whom the approved program provider is receiving payments under the
program;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-44-308(b)(1), concerning the placement of
an approved program provider on probationary status under the Arkansas Adult
Diploma Program Act, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) The department shall place an approved program provider that
does not meet the minimum program performance standards identified in § 6-44-
304 and subsection (a) of this section on probationary status for the
remainder of the fiscal year.
(B) An approved program provider placed on probationary
status under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall submit an
improvement plan to the department.
02/21/2025 4:11:48 PM CRH044

HB1571

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 44, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-44-309. Rules.
The Department of Education, in consultation with the Office of Skills
Development, shall promulgate rules to implement this act.

SECTION 9. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
Department of Education shall file the final rules with the Secretary of
State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The department shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.


















02/21/2025 4:11:48 PM CRH044